Massachusetts, session 194th, H899.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The park managed by the department of conservation and recreation located in the South
Boston section of the City of Boston between Farragut Road and Day Boulevard and East
Broadway and Shore Road shall be formally known as Admiral David G. Farragut Park.
Additionally, the football field behind Joseph R. Evans Memorial Field running from Francis L.
Murphy Memorial Rink to Shore Road shall be designated in memory of Walter Rosher and
Gerard McCarthy. The department shall erect and maintain a suitable marker bearing the
appropriate distinctions for said park and field.
of 1